Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Employee and Employer Contributions; Creation of
Funds for Contributions, Benefits,
and Administrative Expenses

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, Chapter 513-5-1.

47-3-40.
Funds in which assets of the retirement system are to be held.

All of the assets of the retirement system shall be credited according to the purpose for which they are held among three funds, to be known as the “annuity savings fund,” the “pension accumulation fund,” and the “expense fund.”

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 1.

47-3-41.
Annuity savings fund generally.

The annuity savings fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated the contributions deducted from the compensation of members to provide for their annuities. Contributions to and payments from the annuity savings fund shall be made as follows:

After the commencement date, each employer shall cause to be deducted from the salary of each member for each and every payroll period a percentage of the member’s earnable compensation as determined by the board of trustees which shall be not less than 5 nor more than 6 percent; but no such deduction shall be made from the compensation of a member after the close of the school, fiscal, or contract year in which the member has attained age 65 and has completed 40 or more years of creditable service. In determining the amount earnable by a member in a payroll period, the employer may consider the annual rate of compensation payable to such member on the first day of the payroll period as continuing throughout such payroll period. The employer may omit the deduction from compensation for any period which is less than a full payroll period, if a teacher was not a member on the first day of the payroll period. In order to facilitate the making of deductions, the employer may modify the deductions required of any member by an amount not to exceed one-tenth of 1 percent of the annual compensation, on the basis of which such deductions are to be made. Each employer shall immediately pay the amount deducted to the board of trustees, in such manner as the board of trustees shall prescribe, which amount shall be credited by the board of trustees to the individual accounts in the annuity savings fund of the member from whose compensation the deductions were made. Beginning July 1, 1987, the employee contributions required under this paragraph shall be paid as provided in Code Section 47-3-41.1;

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection, at the close of any school, fiscal, or contract year in which a member has completed 40 or more years of creditable service, such member may elect in writing to cease making contributions to the retirement system. If such election is made, such teacher shall notify his employer and the board of trustees in such manner as the board of trustees shall prescribe. After giving the required notice, the employer shall not thereafter deduct, and the employee shall not thereafter be allowed to make, contributions to the retirement system from the salary or compensation of such member;

Any other provision of this or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, a member who has attained age 65 and who has completed 40 or more years of creditable service may elect to continue to make contributions to the retirement system during such continuous period of time as the member continues in service. He shall notify his employer and the board of trustees of such election in such manner as the board of trustees shall provide. Any member who has discontinued making contributions to the retirement system because he has attained age 65 and has 40 years of creditable service and who has continued in service may remit contributions to the board of trustees at the rate required by law and under terms and regulations prescribed by the board of trustees on all earnable compensation received by the member since deductions were discontinued. Contributions made under this paragraph shall entitle the member to creditable service for such period, but only for the purpose of determining average compensation over the highest consecutive years, used in the calculations of the retirement benefits of such member; and

Employer deductions shall be made, notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided for by law for any member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions and payment of salary or compensation, less such deductions, shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such person during the period covered by such payment, except as to the benefits under this chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, no deductions shall be made from a member’s salary if the employer’s contribution as to such member is in default.

The contributions withdrawn by a member or payable in the event of his death shall be paid from the annuity savings fund and any balance of the accumulated contributions standing to the credit of his individual account shall be transferred from the annuity savings fund to the pension accumulation fund.

Upon the retirement of a member, his accumulated contributions shall be transferred from the annuity savings fund to the pension accumulation fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1950, p. 261, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1961, p. 392, § 4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 438, § 6; Ga. L. 1966, p. 562, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 959, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1663, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 12/HB 460.

47-3-41.1.
Payment of employee contributions by employers; mandatory nature; vesting.

Beginning on July 1, 1987, each employer shall pay to the board of trustees on behalf and to the credit of each member required to make employee contributions under subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-41, on each and every payroll period, the employee membership contributions specified by said subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-41 for membership service acquired after June 30, 1987.

Employee contributions made by employers on behalf of members as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be treated as employer contributions in determining federal tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code; provided, however, employers shall continue to withhold federal income taxes on the basis of such contributions until the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be included as gross income of the employee until such time as they are distributed or made available.

Each employer may reduce the compensation payable to a member in an amount not exceeding the amount of the employee contribution paid by the employer on behalf of the member as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. Such reduction in compensation may be made, notwithstanding the fact that the compensation provided by or pursuant to law for the member may be reduced thereby.

Employee contributions made by employers on behalf of members as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be included in the earnable compensation of members in the computation of retirement benefits, and, except for the purposes of subsection (b) of this Code section, such contributions shall continue to be employee contributions for all purposes under this chapter.

The employee contributions provided for in this Code section are mandatory, and no member is entitled under any circumstances to receive such contributions in cash in lieu of having them contributed to the retirement system. Such contributions shall be 100 percent vested for all purposes under the retirement system.

All members shall retain, have, and be subject to all other rights, privileges, obligations, and duties provided for by other provisions of this chapter and such other provisions shall remain of full force and effect with respect to any matter not specifically provided for in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-41.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 959, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 536, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, § 6/HB 969.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “Reserved.”.

U.S. Code.

The United States Internal Revenue Code Section 414(h), referred to in subsection (b), is codified in Title 26, U.S.C. (

26 U.S.C. § 1

et seq.).

47-3-42.
Employer’s duty to deduct, collect, and remit employee contributions; effect of failure to deduct, collect, and remit such contributions.

It shall be the duty of each county board of education, the board of education of each independent school system, and of each and every employer of teachers to deduct and collect the required employee contributions from each teacher’s salary and to make monthly remittance of such amounts to the board of trustees. Each employer shall likewise make the required employer contribution and shall make monthly remittance of such amounts to the board of trustees along with employee contributions. Each employer shall remit the required employee and employer contributions to the board of trustees by the tenth calendar day of the month following the month for which the contributions were made. In the case of the failure or refusal of the employer to remit the employee and employer contributions on or before the tenth calendar day of the month following the month for which the contributions were made, there shall be added to the total amount of remittance due the sum of 1 1/2 percent of the amount of the remittance if the failure or refusal is for not more than one month, and an additional 1 1/2 percent for each additional month or fraction of a month during which the failure or refusal continues.

If any employer fails to collect or remit the employee or employer contributions in the manner set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall be the duty of the board of trustees to notify the State Board of Education of such failure and it shall be the duty of the State Board of Education to withhold from the employer which has failed to comply with subsection (a) of this Code section all appropriations allotted to such employer until such employer has fully complied with subsection (a) of this Code section by making remittance of the sums of contributions required of employees and employers under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1155, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 975, §§ 1, 2.

47-3-43.
Pension accumulation fund generally.

The pension accumulation fund shall be the fund in which shall be held the reserves on all annuities in force and from which shall be paid all annuities and all benefits in lieu of annuities under this chapter. If a beneficiary is restored to membership, his annuity reserve shall be transferred from the pension accumulation fund to the annuity savings fund and credited to his individual account therein. The pension accumulation fund shall also be the fund in which shall be accumulated all reserves for the payment of all pensions and other benefits payable from contributions made by employers and from which shall be paid all such pensions and other benefits, as follows:

The contribution of employers of members shall consist of a percentage of the earnable compensation of members to be known as the normal cost contribution and an additional percentage of such earnable compensation to be known as the unfunded accrued liability contribution. The rate of such contribution shall be fixed on the basis of the liabilities of the retirement system as shown by actuarial valuation, as provided for in Code Section 47-3-23, subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-20-10;

The state’s share of employer contributions, which is to be borne by appropriation from the state, payable to the board of trustees, shall consist of the normal cost and unfunded accrued liability contributions based on the part of the earnable compensation of members payable from funds of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or other funds of the state, but excluding any appropriations made to the State Board of Education, at the rates determined under this Code section. The balance of the cost for pensions, consisting of the normal cost and unfunded accrued liability contributions at the rates determined under this Code section, shall be borne by the employers having contributing members in their employ, including local units of administration for all members in their employ; and each such employer shall pay, from any funds available to such employer expressly including funds derived from the state under Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20, the “Quality Basic Education Act,” such contributions to the board of trustees, immediately upon coming due, which contributions shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund; and

The compensation of a member referred to in this Code section shall include any compensation derived from grants and contracts made by outside agencies with an employer. Such compensation is subject to the employer contribution rate. The outside agencies supplying the grants or entering into the contracts shall pay the applicable employer contributions rate to the employer, who shall pay such contribution to the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1956, p. 400, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 392, §§ 5-7; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, §§ 4, 8; Ga. L. 1970, p. 217, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1986, p. 375, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 13/HB 460.

47-3-44.
Crediting to pension accumulation fund; annual transfer from pension accumulation fund to provide regular interest.

All interest and dividends earned on the funds of the retirement system shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. Once each year the board of trustees shall transfer from the pension accumulation fund to the annuity savings fund such amounts as are sufficient to allow regular interest on the balances of the individual accounts of members in the annuity savings fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, §§ 5, 8.

47-3-45.
Obligations of the pension accumulation fund; permissible uses of the assets of the pension accumulation fund and of income, interest, and dividends.

The maintenance of annuity reserves and pension reserves of the retirement system, the crediting of regular interest to the annuity savings fund, and the payment of all pensions, annuities, retirement allowances, refunds, and other benefits granted under this chapter shall be obligations of the pension accumulation fund, provided that the payments of such other benefit do not adversely affect the qualified status of the retirement system under Section 401(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code. All assets of the pension accumulation fund and all income, interest, and dividends derived from deposits and investments shall be used for the payment of such obligations and for no other purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 12; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 14/HB 460; Ga. L. 2006, p. 93, § 1/SB 466.

47-3-46.
Date on which contributions to the retirement system are to commence.

No contributions to the retirement system shall be made by the state, by employers, or by members prior to the commencement date, except the contribution of the state for an expense fund to pay the expenses of setting up and operating the retirement system prior to that date. On January 1, 1945, the board of trustees shall notify all employers and the employers shall notify the members that contributions will commence on that date; and thereupon this chapter with reference to such contributions will go into effect.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 8.

47-3-47.
Purpose of the expense fund.

The expense fund shall be the fund to which shall be credited the state funds appropriated to pay the administrative expenses of the retirement system and from which shall be paid all expenses incurred in its administration and operation.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 8.

47-3-48.
Certification to employers of normal and accrued liability contribution rates; estimates by employers of contributions for coming year; requests for appropriations.

Thirty days prior to the time the State Board of Education fixes the minimum schedule of teachers’ salaries for the ensuing year, the normal and accrued contribution rates, as determined on the basis of the last annual actuarial valuation, shall be certified by the board of trustees to each employer having members in its employ. Each such employer other than the state shall include in its budget filed with the State School Superintendent amounts equal to the prospective contributions on account of contributing members in its employ for the ensuing year. The Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia in its estimates of the funds necessary for the operation of its respective units, which estimates are submitted to the Governor and General Assembly, shall include a request for an appropriation payable to the board of trustees in an amount equal to the portion of the normal and accrued liability contributions payable from funds of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or from other state funds and for an additional amount as expense for the operation of the retirement system. The General Assembly shall make appropriations to the board of trustees sufficient to provide for such contributions as a part of the earnable compensation of members payable from such funds and for the necessary expenses of carrying out this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 8; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 8; Ga. L. 1986, p. 375, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1.

47-3-49.
Effective date of chapter; effect of appropriation of funds on the obligation to make employee and employer contributions to the retirement system.

This chapter shall become effective on March 19, 1943, but neither the state nor any other employer or member shall be obligated to make contributions for the pensions and annuities under this chapter until after the General Assembly has by appropriation made available funds for the contribution of the state for its part of such pensions and annuities.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 14.